New Jersey, session 221, S1999.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Services provided to employed, permanently-disabled individuals through the NJ WorkAbility Program, established pursuant to P.L.2000, c.116, and in accordance with the federal Ticket to Work and Work Incentives Improvement Act of 1999, Pub.L.106-170, shall be provided by health maintenance organizations and fee-for-service providers that have executed a contract with the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services to provide benefits through the State Medicaid program, established pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.), except that reimbursable personal care assistant services shall be limited to a maximum of 112 hours per calendar work week. 2.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act and to secure federal financial participation for State Medicaid expenditures under the federal Medicaid program. 3.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to effectuate the purposes of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately, and shall apply to any contract executed on or after the effective date of this act between the Division of Medical Assistance and Health Services in the Department of Human Services and a health maintenance organization or a fee-for-service provider that provides benefits through the State Medicaid program, established pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.).